New York, session 2025-2026, S8264.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 3 of section 99-ii of the 2 state finance law, as added by chapter 92 of the laws of 2021, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (b) Reasonable costs incurred by the office of cannabis management and 5 the cannabis control board for implementing, administering, and enforc- 6 ing the marihuana regulation and taxation act, including, but not limit- 7 ed to, the cost of implementing track and tracing of product programs. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10699-02-5